South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3295.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-1-260.  Notwithstanding another provision of law to the contrary, OnStar and any other company that maintains an in-vehicle security system for a motor vehicle must release vehicle location information to a law enforcement agency upon request in an emergency situation. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----